Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 4
LIVESTOCK DISEASE CONTROL — TUBERCULOSIS

Sec.

§ 25-401. Performance of chapter.

The department of agriculture of the state of Idaho, through the division of animal industries, is hereby empowered to carry out all the provisions of this act.

History.

1923, ch. 158, § 1, p. 231; I.C.A.,§ 24-401; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 133, p. 364.

§ 25-402. Compensation for destroyed cattle or other animals.

When cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae, or camelidae are destroyed on account of tuberculosis as herein provided, compensation may be paid to the owner of such animals as provided by law; and, provided further, that in no case shall the state pay more than the difference between the appraised value of the animals less any federal indemnity and salvage value.

History.

1923, ch. 158, § 3, p. 231; am. 1927, ch. 55, § 1, p. 69; am. 1929, ch. 245, § 1, p. 500; I.C.A.,§ 24-403; am. 1941, ch. 107, § 1, p. 190; am. 1993, ch. 14, § 1, p. 55; am. 2006, ch. 93, § 1, p. 267.

§ 25-403. Exceptions.

No payments shall be made for any cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae, or camelidae destroyed in the following cases:

a. If the owner does not disinfect the premises, etc., as directed by the state division or federal bureaus.

b. For any animal destroyed where the owner has not complied with all lawful quarantine regulations.

c. Animals reacting to a test not approved by the state division or federal bureaus.

d. Animals belonging to the state of Idaho or the United States government.

e. Animals brought into the state in violation of the state laws and regulations.

f. Animals which the owner, or claimant, knew to be diseased, or had notice thereof, at the time they came into their possession.

g. Animals which had the disease for which they were slaughtered, or which were destroyed by reason of exposure to the disease, at the time of their arrival in the state.

h. Animals which have not been within the state of Idaho for a period of at least one hundred and twenty (120) days prior to the discovery of the disease.

i. Where the owner has failed to submit the necessary reports as required by this act.

History.

1923, ch. 158, § 4, p. 231; I.C.A.,§ 24-404; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 134, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 14, § 2, p. 55.